Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 201881-2218
Area agency on aging; governing unit; duties.

The governing unit of the designated area agency on aging shall:

(1) In accordance with section 81-2219, employ a qualified administrator to serve as the chief executive officer for the administration of the agency and employ adequate staff for carrying out the area program plan;

(2) Approve and submit an area plan and budget to the department pursuant to section 81-2213. The plan shall comply with the requirements of the Nebraska Community Aging Services Act and the federal Older Americans Act of 1965, as such federal act existed on January 1, 2016;

(3) Approve such contracts and agreements as are necessary to carry out the functions of the agency; and

(4) Establish and consult with an area advisory council on needs, services, and policies affecting older individuals in the area. The advisory council for the area agency on aging shall establish bylaws which specify the role and functions of the council, number of members, selection of members, term of membership, and frequency of meetings.

Laws 1982, LB 404, § 18;

Laws 1991, LB 58, § 20;

Laws 2016, LB698, § 30.